District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-915

Voting — By mail.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 15
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-915.
1981 Ed., § 29-1115.
1973 Ed., § 29-815.

Prior Codifications